Georgia statutes. TITLE 23 Equity
Article 3 Fraud

Cross references.

Pleading requirements in actions involving fraud, §

9-11-9

.

Uniform Deceptive Trade Practices Act,
§

10-1-370

et seq.

Further provisions regarding fraud in contracts, §§

13-4-60

,

13-5-5

.

Fraudulent entries in elections, §

21-2-562

et seq.

Equitable estoppel, §

24-14-29

.

23-2-50.
Concurrent jurisdiction over fraud.

In all cases of fraud, except fraud in the execution of a will, equity has concurrent jurisdiction with the law.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3103; Code 1868, § 3115; Code 1873, § 3172; Code 1882, § 3172; Civil Code 1895, § 4024; Civil Code 1910, § 4621; Code 1933, § 37-701.

Cross references.

For further provisions regarding actions for fraud, deceit, etc., see T. 51, C. 6.

23-2-51.
Fraud as actual or constructive.

Fraud may be actual or constructive.

Actual fraud consists of any kind of artifice by which another is deceived. Constructive fraud consists of any act of omission or commission, contrary to legal or equitable duty, trust, or confidence justly reposed, which is contrary to good conscience and operates to the injury of another.

Actual fraud implies moral guilt; constructive fraud may be consistent with innocence.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3104; Code 1868, § 3116; Code 1873, § 3173; Code 1882, § 3173; Civil Code 1895, § 4025; Civil Code 1910, § 4622; Code 1933, § 37-702.

Law reviews.

For case note, “Lynch v. Waters: Tolling Georgia’s Statute of Limitations for Medical Malpractice,” see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 1493 (1987).

23-2-52.
Misrepresentation as legal fraud.

Misrepresentation of a material fact, made willfully to deceive or recklessly without knowledge and acted on by the opposite party or made innocently and mistakenly and acted on by the opposite party, constitutes legal fraud.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3105; Code 1868, § 3117; Code 1873, § 3174; Code 1882, § 3174; Civil Code 1895, § 4026; Civil Code 1910, § 4623; Code 1933, § 37-703.

Law reviews.

For article, “Consumer Protection Against Sellers Misrepresentations,” see 20 Mercer L. Rev. 414 (1969).

23-2-53.
Suppression of fact as fraud.

Suppression of a material fact which a party is under an obligation to communicate constitutes fraud. The obligation to communicate may arise from the confidential relations of the parties or from the particular circumstances of the case.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3106; Code 1868, § 3118; Code 1873, § 3175; Code 1882, § 3175; Civil Code 1895, § 4027; Civil Code 1910, § 4624; Code 1933, § 37-704.

Law reviews.

For article, “Common Fact Patterns of Stock Broker Fraud and Misconduct,” see 7 Ga. St. B.J. 14 (2002).

For note as to recovery by home buyer for fraud in passive concealment by vendor, see 29 Mercer L. Rev. 323 (1977).

23-2-54.
Surprise as a form of fraud.

Anything which happens without the agency or fault of the party affected by it, tending to disturb and confuse his judgment or to mislead him, of which the opposite party takes an undue advantage, is in equity a surprise and is a form of fraud for which relief is granted.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3111; Code 1868, § 3123; Code 1873, § 3180; Code 1882, § 3180; Civil Code 1895, § 4034; Civil Code 1910, § 4631; Code 1933, § 37-711.

23-2-55.
Use of similar trademarks, names, or devices.

Any attempt to encroach upon the business of a trader or other person by the use of similar trademarks, names, or devices, with the intention of deceiving and misleading the public, is a fraud for which equity will grant relief.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3112; Code 1868, § 3124; Code 1873, § 3181; Code 1882, § 3181; Civil Code 1895, § 4035; Civil Code 1910, § 4632; Code 1933, § 37-712.

Cross references.

Registration and use of trademarks and service marks generally, §

10-1-440

.

23-2-56.
Consummation of fraud.

Fraud may be consummated by signs or tricks, or through agents employed to deceive, or by any other unfair way used to cheat another.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3107; Code 1868, § 3119; Code 1873, § 3176; Code 1882, § 3176; Civil Code 1895, § 4028; Civil Code 1910, § 4625; Code 1933, § 37-705.

23-2-57.
Proving existence of fraud.

Fraud may not be presumed but, being in itself subtle, slight circumstances may be sufficient to carry conviction of its existence.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 2715; Code 1868, § 2709; Code 1873, § 2751; Code 1882, § 2751; Civil Code 1895, § 4029; Civil Code 1910, § 4626; Code 1933, § 37-706.

23-2-58.
Confidential relations defined.

Any relationship shall be deemed confidential, whether arising from nature, created by law, or resulting from contracts, where one party is so situated as to exercise a controlling influence over the will, conduct, and interest of another or where, from a similar relationship of mutual confidence, the law requires the utmost good faith, such as the relationship between partners; principal and agent; guardian or conservator and minor or ward; personal representative or temporary administrator and heir, legatee, devisee, or beneficiary; trustee and beneficiary; and similar fiduciary relationships.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3108; Code 1868, § 3120; Code 1873, § 3177; Code 1882, § 3177; Civil Code 1895, § 4030; Civil Code 1910, § 4627; Code 1933, § 37-707; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 2-26/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, substituted “partners; principal and agent; guardian or conservator and minor or ward; personal representative or temporary administrator and heir, legatee, devisee, or beneficiary; trustee and beneficiary; and similar fiduciary relationships” for “partners, principal and agent, etc” at the end of the Code section.

Cross references.

Agency generally, T. 10, C. 6.

Confidential relationships for purposes of exclusion of evidence, §

24-5-501

et seq.

Law reviews.

For annual survey article discussing wills, trusts and administration of estates, see 52 Mercer L. Rev. 481 (2000).

For article, “Georgia’s Law of Undue Influence in Gift-Making,” see 5 Ga. St. B.J. 12 (2000).

For article, “Common Fact Patterns of Stock Broker Fraud and Misconduct,” see 7 Ga. St. B.J. 14 (2002).

For survey article on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration for the period from June 1, 2002 to May 31, 2003, see 55 Mercer L. Rev. 459 (2003).

For annual survey of law of wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 56 Mercer L. Rev. 457 (2004).

For survey article on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 447 (2007).

For article, “Holmes v. Grubman:
The Supreme Court of Georgia Balances Financial Advisor Common Law Liability and Investor Protection,” see 16 (No. 5) Ga. St. B.J. 20 (2011).

For article, “What Duty of Care Does a Homeowner Association Owe Its Members?,” see 22 Ga. St. Bar J. 19 (Dec. 2016).

For note, “The Great Escape: How One Plaintiff’s Sidestep of a Mandatory Arbitration Clause Was Applied to a Class in Bickerstaff v. SunTrust Bank,” see 68 Mercer L. Rev. 539 (2017).

23-2-59.
Acquisition of antagonistic rights by one in confidential relationship.

Where, by the act or consent of parties or the act of a third person or of the law, one person is placed in such relation to another that he becomes interested for him or with him in any subject or property, he is prohibited from acquiring rights in that subject or property which are antagonistic to the person with whose interest he has become associated.

History.

Civil Code 1895, § 4031; Civil Code 1910, § 4628; Code 1933, § 37-708.

History of Code section.

This Code section is derived from the decision in Larey v. Baker,

86 Ga. 468

,

12 S.E. 684

(1890).

Law reviews.

For annual survey of law of wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 56 Mercer L. Rev. 457 (2004).

23-2-60.
Annulment of conveyances for fraud.

Fraud will authorize equity to annul conveyances, however solemnly executed.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3109; Code 1868, § 3121; Code 1873, § 3178; Code 1882, § 3178; Civil Code 1895, § 4032; Civil Code 1910, § 4629; Code 1933, § 37-709; Ga. L. 1986, p. 294, § 4.